Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2226.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 2(4) and 3(a) of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, are amended to read:Section 2. Definitions.--As used in this act.* * *(4) "Unfair methods of competition" and "unfair or deceptive acts or practices" mean any one or more of the following:(i) Passing off goods or services as those of another;<--123456789101112131415161718 (ii) Causing likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding as to the source, sponsorship, approval or certification of goods or services;(iii) Causing likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding as to affiliation, connection or association with, or certification by, another;(iv) Using deceptive representations or designations of geographic origin in connection with goods or services;(v) Representing that goods or services have sponsorship, approval, characteristics, ingredients, uses, benefits or quantities that they do not have or that a person has a sponsorship, approval, status, affiliation or connection that he does not have;(vi) Representing that goods are original or new if they are deteriorated, altered, reconditioned, reclaimed, used or secondhand;(vii) Representing that goods or services are of a particular standard, quality or grade, or that goods are of a particular style or model, if they are of another;(viii) Disparaging the goods, services or business of another by false or misleading representation of fact;(ix) Advertising goods or services with intent not to sell them as advertised;(x) Advertising goods or services with intent not to supply reasonably expectable public demand, unless the advertisement discloses a limitation of quantity;(xi) Making false or misleading statements of fact concerning the reasons for, existence of, or amounts of price reductions;(xii) Promising or offering prior to time of sale to pay, 20260HB2226PN3706 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 credit or allow to any buyer, any compensation or reward for the procurement of a contract for purchase of goods or services with another or others, or for the referral of the name or names of another or others for the purpose of attempting to procure or procuring such a contract of purchase with such other person or persons when such payment, credit, compensation or reward is contingent upon the occurrence of an event subsequent to the time of the signing of a contract to purchase;(xiii) Promoting or engaging in any plan by which goods or services are sold to a person for a consideration and upon the further consideration that the purchaser secure or attempt to secure one or more persons likewise to join the said plan; each purchaser to be given the right to secure money, goods or services depending upon the number of persons joining the plan. In addition, promoting or engaging in any plan, commonly known as or similar to the so-called "Chain-Letter Plan," "Pyramid Club" or "Pyramid Promotional Scheme." The terms "Chain-Letter Plan" or "Pyramid Club" mean any scheme for the disposal or distribution of property, services or anything of value whereby a participant pays valuable consideration, in whole or in part, for an opportunity to receive compensation for introducing or attempting to introduce one or more additional persons to participate in the scheme or for the opportunity to receive compensation when a person introduced by the participant introduces a new participant. The term "Pyramid Promotional Scheme" means any plan or operation by which a person gives consideration for the opportunity to receive compensation that is derived primarily from the introduction of other persons into the plan or operation rather than from the sale and consumption of goods, services or intangible property by a participant or 20260HB2226PN3706 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other persons introduced into the plan or operation. The term includes any plan or operation under which the number of people who may participate is limited either expressly or by the application of conditions affecting the eligibility of a person to receive compensation under the plan or operation, and includes any plan or operation under which a person, on giving any consideration, obtains any goods, services or intangible property in addition to the right to receive compensation. As used in this subclause the term "consideration" means an investment of cash or the purchase of goods, other property, training or services, but does not include payments made for sales demonstration equipment and materials for use in making sales and not for resale furnished at no profit to any person in the program or to the company or corporation, nor does the term apply to a minimal initial payment of twenty-five dollars ($25) or less;(xiv) Failing to comply with the terms of any written guarantee or warranty given to the buyer at, prior to or after a contract for the purchase of goods or services is made;(xv) Knowingly misrepresenting that services, replacements or repairs are needed if they are not needed;(xvi) Making repairs, improvements or replacements on tangible, real or personal property, of a nature or quality inferior to or below the standard of that agreed to in writing;(xvii) Making solicitations for sales of goods or services over the telephone without first clearly, affirmatively and expressly stating:(A) the identity of the seller;(B) that the purpose of the call is to sell goods or services;20260HB2226PN3706 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) the nature of the goods or services; and(D) that no purchase or payment is necessary to be able to win a prize or participate in a prize promotion if a prize promotion is offered. This disclosure must be made before or in conjunction with the description of the prize to the person called. If requested by that person, the telemarketer must disclose the no-purchase/no-payment entry method for the prize promotion;(xviii) Using a contract, form or any other document related to a consumer transaction which contains a confessed judgment clause that waives the consumer's right to assert a legal defense to an action;(xix) Soliciting any order for the sale of goods to be ordered by the buyer through the mails or by telephone unless, at the time of the solicitation, the seller has a reasonable basis to expect that it will be able to ship any ordered merchandise to the buyer:(A) within that time clearly and conspicuously stated in any such solicitation; or(B) if no time is clearly and conspicuously stated, within thirty days after receipt of a properly completed order from the buyer, provided, however, where, at the time the merchandise is ordered, the buyer applies to the seller for credit to pay for the merchandise in whole or in part, the seller shall have fifty days, rather than thirty days, to perform the actions required by this subclause;(xx) Failing to inform the purchaser of a new motor vehicle offered for sale at retail by a motor vehicle dealer of the following:(A) that any rustproofing of the new motor vehicle offered 20260HB2226PN3706 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by the motor vehicle dealer is optional;(B) that the new motor vehicle has been rustproofed by the manufacturer and the nature and extent, if any, of the manufacturer's warranty which is applicable to that rustproofing;The requirements of this subclause shall not be applicable and a motor vehicle dealer shall have no duty to inform if the motor vehicle dealer rustproofed a new motor vehicle before offering it for sale to that purchaser, provided that the dealer shall inform the purchaser whenever dealer rustproofing has an effect on any manufacturer's warranty applicable to the vehicle. This subclause shall not apply to any new motor vehicle which has been rustproofed by a motor vehicle dealer prior to the effective date of this subclause.(xxi) The establishment, application or administration of a health insurance policy, contract or practice under which amounts paid by or on behalf of a consumer under the health insurance policy contract or policy, including payments made by a drug manufacturer or other third party, are not applied toward the consumer's deductible, copayment, coinsurance or maximum out-of-pocket costs under the health insurance policy unless otherwise expressly required by Federal law.[(xxi)] (xxii) Engaging in any other fraudulent or deceptive conduct which creates a likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding.* * *Section 3. Unlawful Acts or Practices; Exclusions.--(a) Unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the conduct of any trade or commerce as defined by subclauses (i) through [(xxi)] (xxii) of clause (4) of section 2 20260HB2226PN3706 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of this act and regulations promulgated under section 3.1 of this act are hereby declared unlawful. The provisions of this act shall not apply to any owner, agent or employe of any radio or television station, or to any owner, publisher, printer, agent or employe of an Internet service provider or a newspaper or other publication, periodical or circular, who, in good faith and without knowledge of the falsity or deceptive character thereof, publishes, causes to be published or takes part in the publication of such advertisement.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 9.5. Concurrent Jurisdiction.--(a) The Insurance Department of the Commonwealth shall have concurrent jurisdiction to enforce section 2(4)(xxi). In exercising the jurisdiction, the Department of Insurance shall have the same powers, duties, penalties and remedies as provided under section 406-B of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as "The Insurance Company Law of 1921," including cease and desist orders, suspension or revocation of licenses, restitution, civil penalties and any other penalty or remedy deemed appropriate by the Insurance Commissioner.(b) The remedies provided under this section are in addition to, and not exclusive of, remedies available under this act.Section 3. If under Federal law, application of this act to a health savings account would result in ineligibility of the health savings account under section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 223), this act shall apply only if the health savings account is also a health savings account-qualified high deductible health plan with respect to the deductible of the plan after the enrollee has 20260HB2226PN3706 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 satisfied the minimum deductible under section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, except with respect to items or services that are preventive care under section 223(c)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, in which case the requirements of this section shall apply regardless of whether the minimum deductible under section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 has been satisfied.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.AMENDING TITLE 40 (INSURANCE) OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES, PROVIDING FOR PRESCRIPTION DRUG COST CREDITS IN HEALTH INSURANCE; AND IMPOSING PENALTIES.THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA HEREBY ENACTS AS FOLLOWS:SECTION 1. TITLE 40 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED BY ADDING A CHAPTER TO READ:CHAPTER 52FAIR CO-PAY ASSISTANCE CREDITSSUBCHAPTERA. PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSB. FAIR CO-PAY ASSISTANCE CREDITSC. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSUBCHAPTER APRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSEC.5201. SCOPE OF CHAPTER.5202. DEFINITIONS.§ 5201. SCOPE OF CHAPTER.THIS CHAPTER RELATES TO THE CREDITING OF CO-PAY ASSISTANCE PROVIDED FOR PRESCRIPTION DRUGS TOWARD HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN COST-SHARING. THIS CHAPTER DOES NOT APPLY TO A SELF-INSURED HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN SUBJECT TO 29 U.S.C. CH. 18 (RELATING TO EMPLOYEE 20260HB2226PN3706 - 8 - <--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 RETIREMENT INCOME SECURITY PROGRAM) OR EXEMPTED FROM 29 U.S.C. CH. 18.§ 5202. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS CHAPTER SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"COMMISSIONER." THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER OF THE COMMONWEALTH."COST-SHARING." MEANS AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE SHARE OF THE HEALTH CARE COSTS COVERED BY A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN THAT A COVERED PERSON PAYS OUT-OF-POCKET.(2) THE TERM INCLUDES DEDUCTIBLES, COINSURANCE, COPAYMENTS AND SIMILAR CHARGES.(3) THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE PREMIUMS, BALANCE BILLED AMOUNTS FROM AN OUT-OF-NETWORK HEALTH CARE PROVIDER OR THE COST OF NONCOVERED SERVICES EXCEPT AS SPECIFIED IN THIS CHAPTER."COVERED PERSON." A POLICYHOLDER, SUBSCRIBER OR OTHER INDIVIDUAL WHO IS ENTITLED TO RECEIVE HEALTH CARE SERVICES UNDER A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN."DEPARTMENT." THE INSURANCE DEPARTMENT OF THE COMMONWEALTH."DRUG MANUFACTURER DIRECT SUPPORT." AN AMOUNT A DRUG MANUFACTURER PAYS IN ANY MANNER TOWARD REDUCING THE COST-SHARING INCURRED BY A COVERED PERSON FOR THE PURCHASE OF A SPECIFIC PRESCRIPTION DRUG."GENERICALLY EQUIVALENT DRUG." THE TERM SHALL HAVE THE MEANING GIVEN TO IT IN SECTION 2 OF THE ACT OF NOVEMBER 24, 1976 (P.L.1163, NO.259), KNOWN AS THE GENERIC EQUIVALENT DRUG LAW."HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN." THE TERM SHALL HAVE THE MEANING GIVEN TO IT IN THE ACT OF NOVEMBER 21, 2016 (P.L.1318, NO.169), KNOWN 20260HB2226PN3706 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AS THE PHARMACY BENEFIT REFORM ACT."HEALTH CARE PROVIDER." A PERSON WHO IS LICENSED, CERTIFIED OR OTHERWISE REGULATED TO PROVIDE HEALTH CARE SERVICES UNDER THE LAWS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH."HEALTH INSURER CLIENT." THE TERM SHALL HAVE THE MEANING GIVEN TO IT IN THE PHARMACY BENEFIT REFORM ACT."HEALTH INSURER." THE TERM SHALL HAVE THE MEANING GIVEN TO IT IN THE PHARMACY BENEFIT REFORM ACT."INTERCHANGEABLE BIOLOGICAL PRODUCT." THE TERM SHALL HAVE THE MEANING GIVEN TO IT IN SECTION 2 OF THE GENERIC EQUIVALENT DRUG LAW."OUT-OF-NETWORK HEALTH CARE PROVIDER." A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER WHO DOES NOT CONTRACT WITH A HEALTH INSURER CLIENT TO PROVIDE HEALTH CARE SERVICES TO A COVERED PERSON UNDER A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN."PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER." THE TERM SHALL HAVE THE MEANING GIVEN TO IT IN THE PHARMACY BENEFIT REFORM ACT."PRESCRIPTION DRUG." THE TERM SHALL INCLUDE A DRUG, A GENERICALLY EQUIVALENT DRUG, A BIOLOGICAL PRODUCT, AND AN INTERCHANGEABLE BIOLOGICAL PRODUCT, AS THOSE TERMS ARE DEFINED IN SECTION 2 OF THE GENERIC EQUIVALENT DRUG LAW, THAT IS PRESCRIBED BY A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER. THE TERM SHALL ALSO INCLUDE INSULIN, INSULIN SYRINGES AND INSULIN NEEDLES."PRESCRIPTION DRUG COVERAGE ADMINISTRATOR." A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN, HEALTH INSURER, OR A PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER THAT ADMINISTERS PHARMACY BENEFITS FOR A HEALTH INSURER CLIENT.SUBCHAPTER BFAIR CO-PAY ASSISTANCE CREDITSSEC.5211. COST-SHARING CREDIT.20260HB2226PN3706 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 5212. PROHIBITED CREDITING.5213. LIMITATIONS.5214. EXEMPTED ARRANGEMENTS.§ 5211. COST-SHARING CREDIT.EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 5212 (RELATING TO PROHIBITED CREDITING) OR EXEMPTED BY SECTION 5214 (RELATING TO EXEMPTED ARRANGEMENTS), FOR EACH FILL OF A PRESCRIPTION DRUG, A PRESCRIPTION DRUG COVERAGE ADMINISTRATOR SHALL REDUCE THE COST-SHARING INCURRED BY A COVERED PERSON OR CREDIT TOWARD THE COVERED PERSON'S IN-NETWORK OUT-OF-POCKET MAXIMUM AND OTHER COST-SHARING REQUIREMENTS ANY AMOUNT PAID ON BEHALF OF THE COVERED PERSON BY ANOTHER PERSON FOR THE PRESCRIPTION DRUG, INCLUDING DRUG MANUFACTURER DIRECT SUPPORT, PROVIDED THAT ALL OF THE FOLLOWING APPLY:(1) THE PRESCRIPTION DRUG IS ON THE COVERED PERSON'S HEALTH INSURANCE POLICY FORMULARY.(2) THE PRESCRIPTION DRUG EITHER:(I) DOES NOT HAVE A GENERIC EQUIVALENT DRUG OR INTERCHANGEABLE BIOLOGICAL PRODUCT.(II) DOES HAVE A GENERIC EQUIVALENT DRUG OR INTERCHANGEABLE BIOLOGICAL PRODUCT BUT THE COVERED PERSON HAS OBTAINED ACCESS TO THE PRESCRIPTION DRUG THROUGH ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(A) PRIOR AUTHORIZATION.(B) A STEP THERAPY PROTOCOL.(C) THE HEALTH INSURER'S EXCEPTIONS AND APPEALS PROCESS.§ 5212. PROHIBITED CREDITING.A PRESCRIPTION DRUG COVERAGE ADMINISTRATOR MAY NOT CREDIT DRUG MANUFACTURER DIRECT SUPPORT TOWARD THE COVERED PERSON'S IN-20260HB2226PN3706 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 NETWORK OUT-OF-POCKET MAXIMUM AND OTHER COST-SHARING REQUIREMENTS IF THE SUPPORT IS NOT BOTH:(1) AVAILABLE TO EACH COVERED PERSON OF EVERY HEALTH INSURANCE POLICY ISSUED OR RENEWED IN THIS COMMONWEALTH.(2) AVAILABLE IN THE SAME MONETARY AMOUNT FOR EACH INITIAL FILL AND EACH REFILL THROUGHOUT THE PLAN YEAR OF THE COVERED PERSON'S HEALTH INSURANCE POLICY.§ 5213. LIMITATIONS.A PRESCRIPTION DRUG COVERAGE ADMINISTRATOR MAY NOT CREDIT DRUG MANUFACTURER DIRECT SUPPORT TOWARD THE COVERED PERSON'S IN-NETWORK OUT-OF-POCKET MAXIMUM AND OTHER COST-SHARING REQUIREMENTS IF EITHER OF THE FOLLOWING APPLIES:(1) THE COVERED PERSON'S HEALTH INSURANCE POLICY IS A HIGH DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLAN UNDER 26 U.S.C. § 223(C) (RELATING TO HEALTH SAVINGS ACCOUNTS) OFFERED IN CONJUNCTION WITH A HEALTH SAVINGS ACCOUNT, THE DRUG MANUFACTURER DIRECT SUPPORT IS USED TOWARDS THE PURCHASE OF A PRESCRIPTION DRUG OTHER THAN AS PERMITTED ON A PRE-DEDUCTIBLE BASIS UNDER 26 U.S.C. § 223(C), AND THE DRUG MANUFACTURER DIRECT SUPPORT IS USED DURING ANY PORTION OF THE PLAN YEAR DURING WHICH THE DEDUCTIBLE OF THE HEALTH INSURANCE POLICY IS NOT SATISFIED.(2) THE CREDIT IS NOT APPLIED TO A HEALTH INSURANCE POLICY WHICH IS IN WHOLE OR IN PART DETERMINED TO BE A FEDERAL HEALTH CARE PROGRAM.§ 5214. EXEMPTED ARRANGEMENTS.(A) AGREEMENT.--A PRESCRIPTION DRUG COVERAGE ADMINISTRATOR SHALL BE EXEMPT FROM THE REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION 5211 (RELATING TO COST-SHARING CREDIT) IF IT ENTERS INTO AN AGREEMENT WITH AN ENTITY THAT PROVIDES DRUG MANUFACTURER DIRECT SUPPORT, PURSUANT TO WHICH THE PRESCRIPTION DRUG COVERAGE ADMINISTRATOR ACCEPTS 20260HB2226PN3706 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PAYMENTS ON BEHALF OF COVERED PERSONS, PROVIDED THAT THE AGREEMENT COMPLIES WITH ALL PROVISIONS OF THIS CHAPTER.(B) VOLUNTARY PROGRAM.--A PRESCRIPTION DRUG COVERAGE ADMINISTRATOR'S PROGRAM SHALL BE EXEMPT FROM THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS CHAPTER IF IT IS A VOLUNTARY PROGRAM OFFERED TO A COVERED PERSON UNDER A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN IN WHICH THE VALUE OF A PHARMACEUTICAL MANUFACTURER'S ASSISTANCE PROGRAM IS APPLIED TO REDUCE A COVERED PERSON'S OUT-OF-POCKET COSTS TO A FIXED MONTHLY AMOUNT FOR THE BENEFIT YEAR FOR A SPECIFIC PRESCRIPTION AND ANY ACTUAL COST THE COVERED PERSON PAYS WHILE IN THE PROGRAM IS APPLIED TO THE COVERED PERSON'S APPLICABLE OUT-OF-POCKET MAXIMUM RESPONSIBILITY.SUBCHAPTER CMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSEC.5221. PROTECTIONS.5222. REGULATIONS.5223. ENFORCEMENT.§ 5221. PROTECTIONS.NOTHING IN THIS CHAPTER SHALL REQUIRE A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN TO CREDIT CO-PAY ASSISTANCE FOR A PRESCRIPTION DRUG IN DEROGATION OF A POLICYHOLDER'S CONSTITUTIONAL PROTECTIONS OF RELIGIOUS FREEDOM UNDER THE ACT OF DECEMBER 9, 2002 (P.L.1701, NO.214), KNOWN AS THE RELIGIOUS FREEDOM PROTECTION ACT, OR 42 U.S.C. CH. 21B (RELATING TO RELIGIOUS FREEDOM RESTORATION).§ 5222. REGULATIONS.THE DEPARTMENT MAY PROMULGATE REGULATIONS AS NECESSARY AND APPROPRIATE TO CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS CHAPTER.§ 5223. ENFORCEMENT.(A) PENALTIES.--AFTER SATISFACTORY EVIDENCE OF THE VIOLATION 20260HB2226PN3706 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OF THIS CHAPTER BY A PRESCRIPTION DRUG COVERAGE ADMINISTRATOR, ONE OR MORE OF THE FOLLOWING PENALTIES MAY BE IMPOSED AT THE COMMISSIONER'S DISCRETION:(1) SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION OF THE OFFENDING ENTITY'S LICENSE OR REGISTRATION.(2) REFUSAL, FOR A PERIOD NOT TO EXCEED ONE YEAR, TO ISSUE A NEW LICENSE OR REGISTRATION TO THE OFFENDING ENTITY.(3) A FINE OF NOT MORE THAN $5,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION OF THIS CHAPTER.(4) A FINE OF NOT MORE THAN $10,000 FOR EACH WILLFUL VIOLATION OF THIS CHAPTER.(B) LIMITATION.--FINES IMPOSED AGAINST AN ENTITY UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT EXCEED $500,000 IN THE AGGREGATE DURING A SINGLE CALENDAR YEAR.(C) ADDITIONAL REMEDIES.--THE ENFORCEMENT REMEDIES IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION ARE IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER REMEDIES OR PENALTIES THAT MAY BE IMPOSED UNDER ANY OTHER APPLICABLE LAW OF THIS COMMONWEALTH, INCLUDING:(1) THE ACT OF JULY 22, 1974 (P.L.589, NO.205), KNOWN AS THE UNFAIR INSURANCE PRACTICES ACT. A VIOLATION OF THIS CHAPTER SHALL BE DEEMED TO BE AN UNFAIR METHOD OF COMPETITION AND AN UNFAIR OR DECEPTIVE ACT OR PRACTICE UNDER THE UNFAIR INSURANCE PRACTICES ACT.(2) THE ACT OF DECEMBER 18, 1996 (P.L.1066, NO.159), KNOWN AS THE ACCIDENT AND HEALTH FILING REFORM ACT.(3) THE ACT OF JUNE 25, 1997 (P.L.295, NO.29), KNOWN AS THE PENNSYLVANIA HEALTH CARE INSURANCE PORTABILITY ACT.(4) THE ACT OF NOVEMBER 21, 2016 (P.L.1318, NO.169), AS AMENDED, KNOWN AS THE PHARMACY BENEFIT REFORM ACT.(D) ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE.--THE ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS 20260HB2226PN3706 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OF THIS CHAPTER SHALL BE SUBJECT TO 2 PA.C.S. CH. 5 SUBCH. A (RELATING TO PRACTICE AND PROCEDURE OF COMMONWEALTH AGENCIES). A PARTY AGAINST WHOM PENALTIES ARE ASSESSED IN AN ADMINISTRATIVE ACTION MAY APPEAL TO COMMONWEALTH COURT AS PROVIDED IN 2 PA.C.S. CH. 7 SUBCH. A (RELATING TO JUDICIAL REVIEW OF COMMONWEALTH AGENCY ACTION).SECTION 2. THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(1) FOR HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS FOR WHICH EITHER RATES OR FORMS ARE REQUIRED TO BE FILED WITH THE DEPARTMENT, THIS CHAPTER SHALL APPLY TO ANY POLICY FOR WHICH A FORM OR RATE IS FIRST FILED ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH.(2) FOR HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS FOR WHICH NEITHER RATES NOR FORMS ARE REQUIRED TO BE FILED WITH THE DEPARTMENT, THIS CHAPTER SHALL APPLY TO ANY POLICY ISSUED OR RENEWED ON OR AFTER 180 DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH.SECTION 3. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT AS FOLLOWS:(1) SECTION 2 OF THIS ACT AND THIS SECTION SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.(2) THE REMAINDER OF THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20260HB2226PN3706 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021